Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.370

Operator or driver.

"Operator or driver" means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle.

[ 1975 c 62 s 6; 1967 c 32 s 1; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.370. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 38; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: See note following RCW 36.75.010.